Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.405

Purchaser lists—Authorized uses.

(1) The legislature recognizes the proprietary interest camping resort operators have in purchaser lists. The legislature also recognizes that purchasers of camping resort contracts have a legitimate interest in being able to contact other resort purchasers for the purpose of forming a members' association. In balancing these competing interests, the legislature believes that purchaser lists can be made available to camping resort purchasers with reasonable restrictions on the dissemination of those lists.

(2) Upon request of a purchaser, the camping resort operator shall provide to the purchaser a list of the names, addresses, and unit, site, or purchaser number of all purchasers. The camping resort operator may charge for the reasonable costs for preparing the list. The operator shall require the purchaser to sign an affidavit agreeing not to use the list for any commercial purpose.

(3) It is a violation of this chapter and chapter 19.86 RCW for any person to use a membership list for commercial purposes unless authorized to do so by the operator.

(4) It is a violation of this chapter and chapter 19.86 RCW for a camping resort operator to fail to provide a list of purchasers as provided in this section.

[ 1988 c 159 s 17.]